New York, session 2025-2026, A7688.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "climate safe and responsible bank procurement act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. 1. The legislature affirms the goals of the 4 New York Climate Leadership and Community Protection Act, which commits 5 New York to achieving an 85% reduction from 1990 greenhouse gas emis- 6 sions level by 2050, and to 100% emissions free electricity by 2040. 7 2. New York's state climate impact assessment has concluded that many 8 fundamental aspects of New York State's climate have already begun to 9 change, and the changes are projected to continue--and in some cases, 10 accelerate--throughout the 21st century, that climate change is creating 11 conditions that will increase the frequency and severity of many types 12 of extreme events, and that unless the world takes serious action to 13 reduce greenhouse gas emissions and control future warming, unmitigated 14 emissions could have severe adverse consequences. 15 3. The Financial Stability Oversight Council has concluded that 16 climate change presents an emerging and increasing threat to financial 17 stability. 18 4. The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal 19 Deposit Insurance Corporation, and the Office of the Comptroller of the 20 Currency have produced guidance for the financial institutions that they 21 regulate to focus on key aspects of climate-related financial risk 22 management. 23 5. The International Energy Agency has released an energy roadmap for 24 how governments around the world can achieve the goals enunciated in the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01163-01-5 A. 7688 2 1 2015 Paris Accords, and concluded that there is no need for investment 2 in new fossil fuel supply in our net zero pathway. 3 6. The New York State Department of Financial Services has issued 4 guidance that regulated institutions start integrating both financial 5 and operational risks from climate change into their governance frame- 6 works, risk management processes, and business strategies, and start 7 developing their approach to climate-related financial risk disclosure. 8 § 3. Section 2 of the state finance law is amended by adding five new 9 subdivisions 23, 24, 25, 26 and 27 to read as follows: 10 23. "Clean energy supply financing ratio" is the total financing 11 through equity and debt underwriting, and project finance in low carbon 12 energy supply relative to that in fossil fuel energy supply and includes 13 methodology for ratio, including what is classified as low carbon or 14 fossil fuel. 15 24. "Coal project" means a project designed to use coal for the 16 purpose of electric power generation or to produce thermal coal. 17 25. "Fossil fuel project" or "Fossil fuel infrastructure" means a 18 project designed to produce and transport fossil fuels. This includes 19 projects that would support exploring new oil and gas fields or other- 20 wise expanding oil and gas reserves. 21 26. "New fossil fuel project" or "New fossil fuel infrastructure" 22 means a project designed to facilitate the production and transportation 23 of fossil fuels in excess of what is in development as of the effective 24 date of this subdivision. This includes but is not limited to production 25 of new coal, oil and gas infrastructure, power plants, wells or mines. 26 It also includes projects that would support exploring new oil and gas 27 fields or otherwise expanding oil and gas reserves. 28 27. "Underwriting" means providing bond buying and selling, financial 29 advice, promotion, legal, risk management and any other relevant 30 services for a bond issue. 31 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 161 of the state finance law is amended 32 by adding a new paragraph o to read as follows: 33 o. (i) Establish, no later than December thirty-first, two thousand 34 twenty-six, procurement guidance for the purchasing of banking services 35 through centralized state contracting and discretionary contracting that 36 shall require agencies to consider each of the following individual 37 criteria as positive components of best value for the purpose of making 38 purchasing decisions for banking services, including but not limited to 39 credit cards, credit card processing and depository services: 40 (1) whether a bank discloses scope one, two and three emissions in 41 full compliance with category fifteen of the greenhouse gas emissions 42 reporting protocol; 43 (2) whether a bank discloses its clean energy supply financing ratio; 44 (3) whether a bank has established a policy that explicitly bars 45 support for coal projects or infrastructure; 46 (4) whether a bank has established policies covering the transition 47 away from financing of new fossil fuel projects or infrastructure; 48 (5) whether a bank has established policies to transition away from 49 all existing investments in fossil fuel projects or infrastructure; and 50 (6) whether a bank has produced a plan for achieving net zero carbon 51 emissions by two thousand fifty that has been affirmed as consistent 52 with the standards pronounced by the science based targets initiative. 53 (ii) For the purposes of this paragraph, "bank" shall have the same 54 meaning as subdivision one of section two of the banking law, provided, 55 however, it shall only include such banks that have at least one hundred 56 billion in total consolidated assets. A. 7688 3 1 § 5. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 65-a to 2 read as follows: 3 § 65-a. Climate safe and responsible borrowing requirements. 1. 4 Neither the state nor any authorities, agencies, commissions or corpo- 5 rations of the state shall contract with or otherwise provide payment 6 for or services with a bank for underwriting in a bond issuance or refi- 7 nancing that has not disclosed scope one, two and three emissions in 8 full compliance with category fifteen of the greenhouse gas emissions 9 reporting protocol by the beginning of calendar year two thousand twen- 10 ty-seven. 11 2. When making a determination as to which bank to use for underwrit- 12 ing in a bond issuance or refinancing, the state and any authorities, 13 agencies, commissions or corporations of the state shall consider: 14 (a) whether a bank discloses its clean energy supply financing ratio; 15 (b) whether a bank has established a policy that explicitly bars 16 support for coal projects; 17 (c) whether a bank has committed to withholding any support for new 18 fossil fuel infrastructure; 19 (d) whether a bank has committed to phasing out all existing invest- 20 ments in fossil fuel projects; and 21 (e) whether a bank has produced a plan for achieving net zero carbon 22 emissions by two thousand fifty that has been affirmed as consistent 23 with the standards pronounced by the science based targets initiative. 24 3. In considering the best value of underwriting in a bond issuance or 25 refinancing, the state and any authorities, agencies, commissions or 26 corporations of the state shall consider each of the criteria listed in 27 subdivision two of this section as positive components of best value to 28 be considered alongside but not necessarily with the same weight as any 29 other considerations of best value as employed by the state and any 30 authorities, agencies, commissions or corporations of the state. 31 4. For the purposes of this section, "bank" shall have the same mean- 32 ing as subdivision one of section two of the banking law, provided, 33 however, it shall only include such banks that have at least one hundred 34 billion in total consolidated assets. 35 § 6. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 36 section, or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent 37 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 38 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 39 to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section, or part there- 40 of directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall 41 have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legis- 42 lature that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid 43 provisions had not been included herein. 44 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.